Missouri, session 2026, SB1501.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 311.185, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 311.185,
to read as follows:
311.185. 1. Notwithstanding any rule, law, or
regulation to the contrary, any person currently licensed in
this state [or any other state] as a wine manufacturer,
distilled spirits manufacturer, or retailer under this
chapter may apply for, and the supervisor of alcohol and
tobacco control may issue, a [wine] direct shipper license,
as provided in this section[, which allows a wine]. The
license shall allow such manufacturer or retailer to ship
[up to two cases of] wine [per month] or distilled spirits
produced or lawfully purchased by the licensee, up to
volumes authorized in this section, directly to:
(1) A resident of this state who is at least twenty-
one years of age, for such resident's personal use and not
for resale[. Before sending any shipment to a resident of
this state, the wine manufacturer shall first obtain a wine
direct shipper license as follows:]; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1501 2
(2) A resident of another state, provided that the
destination state permits direct shipment of alcoholic
beverages to residents and the shipment complies with that
state's law.
2. To receive a direct shipper license an applicant
shall:
(1) File an application with the division of alcohol
and tobacco control on forms prescribed by the division; and
(2) Provide to the division of alcohol and tobacco
control a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage
license issued in this state [or any other state, as well as
a copy of the winery license from] and, if applicable, its
federal basic permit issued by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax
and Trade Bureau.
[2.] 3. All [wine] direct shipper licensees shall:
(1) Not ship more than two cases of wine or one case
of distilled spirits per month to any person for his or her
personal use and not for resale;
(2) [Not use any carrier for shipping of wine that is
not] Use only carriers licensed under this section;
(3) [Only] Ship [wine that is properly registered with
the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau] only alcoholic
beverages lawfully produced, purchased, or possessed under
the laws of this state;
(4) [Only ship wine manufactured on the winery
premises;
(5)] Ensure that all containers of [wine] alcoholic
beverages delivered directly to a resident of this state or
another state are conspicuously labeled with the words
"CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER
REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY" or [are conspicuously labeled with]

SB 1501 3
other wording preapproved by the division of alcohol and
tobacco control;
[(6) If the winery is located outside of this state,]
(5) By January thirty-first each year, make a report under
oath to the supervisor of the division of alcohol and
tobacco control setting out the total amount of [wine]
alcoholic beverages shipped into [the] or out of this state
the preceding year;
[(7) If the winery is located outside of this state,
pay the division of alcohol and tobacco control all excise
taxes due on the amount to be calculated as if the sale were
in this state at the location where the delivery is made;]
(6) Pay all applicable state excise and sales taxes on
alcoholic beverages shipped to residents of this state and
comply with any applicable excise or reporting requirements
for shipments to other states;
[(8) If the winery is located within this state,] (7)
Provide the division of alcohol and tobacco control any
additional information deemed necessary [beyond that already
required for retail sales from the winery tasting room] to
ensure compliance with this section;
[(9)] (8) Permit the division of alcohol and tobacco
control to perform an audit of the [wine direct shipper]
licensees' records upon request; and
[(10)] (9) Be deemed to have consented to the
jurisdiction of the division of alcohol and tobacco control
or any other state agency and the Missouri courts concerning
enforcement of this section and any related laws, rules, or
regulations.
[3. The wine direct shipper licensee may annually
renew its license with the division of alcohol and tobacco
control by providing the division of alcohol and tobacco

SB 1501 4
control all required items provided in subsection 1 of this
section.]
4. (1) Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation
to the contrary, any carrier may apply for, and the
supervisor of the division of alcohol and tobacco control
may issue, an alcohol carrier license[, as provided in this
section, which] that allows the carrier to transport and
deliver shipments of [wine] alcoholic beverages directly to
a resident of this state [who is at least twenty-one years
of age or older. Before transporting any shipment of wine
to a resident of this state, the carrier shall first obtain
an alcohol carrier license by filing an application with the
division of alcohol and tobacco control] or another state in
which such shipments are permitted.
[5.] (2) All alcohol carrier licensees shall:
[(1)] (a) Not deliver to any person under twenty-one
years of age[,] or to any intoxicated person[, or any person
appearing to be in a state of intoxication];
[(2)] (b) Require valid proof of identity and age;
[(3)] (c) Obtain the signature of an adult as a
100 condition of delivery; and
101 [(4)] (d) Keep records of [wine] alcoholic beverages
102 shipped, which include the license number and name of the
103 [winery or retailer] shipper, quantity [of wine] shipped,
104 recipient's name and address, carrier license number and
105 tracking number, and an electronic or paper form of
106 signature from the recipient [of the wine].
107 5. The direct shipper licensee may annually renew its
108 license with the division of alcohol and tobacco control by
109 providing all required documentation and paying applicable
110 fees.

SB 1501 5
111 6. The division of alcohol and tobacco control may
112 promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this
113 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
114 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
115 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
116 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
117 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
118 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
119 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
120 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
121 date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
122 unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
123 any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2007, shall be
124 invalid and void.
125 7. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
126 (1) "Direct shipper license", a license issued under
127 this section to a Missouri wine manufacturer, distilled
128 spirits manufacturer, or retailer;
129 (2) "Distilled spirits", an intoxicating liquor that
130 is distilled, blended, or compounded;
131 (3) "Retailer", any person licensed under this chapter
132 to sell intoxicating liquor by the package or drink for
133 consumption on or off the premises.
✓